Illinois, session 104th, SB3017.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Drainage Code is amended by 5changing Section 4-5 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 605/4-5)  (from Ch. 42, par. 4-5)7    Sec. 4-5. Election of Commissioners in Districts organized 8under Farm Drainage Act and certain other Districts. 9Commissioners for all districts which, at the time this Act 10becomes effective, are operating and existing under the 11provisions of the Farm Drainage Act, shall be elected by the 12adult owners of land in the district in the manner provided by 13this Section unless the landowners have elected to change from 14the election to the appointment of commissioners in the manner 15provided in Section 4-6.16    An election shall be held in all combined, union, special, 17user, mutual or other districts which were operating and 18existing under the Farm Drainage Act at the time this Act 19became effective and in districts which have changed from the 20appointment to the election of commissioners as provided in 21Section 4-8, on the first Tuesday in September 1956 and 22annually thereafter for the purpose of electing a successor to 23the commissioner whose term will next expire. Commissioners so   SB3017- 2 -LRB104 17953 TRT 31390 b1elected shall serve for a term of 3 years from the date of 2their election and until their successors have been elected 3and have qualified.4    In any case where the commissioners have failed to give 5notice and to hold an election as provided in this Section, the 6circuit court of the county in which the district is organized 7may, on the petition of any owner of land in the district, 8designate the time and place for a special election. Any 9commissioner elected at such special election shall serve for 10the remainder of the term expiring 3 years from the date on 11which the election should have been held and until his or her 12successor is elected and has qualified.13    The commissioners in office shall designate the place 14within the district at which the election will be held and they 15shall file such designation in writing with the clerk of the 16circuit court at least four weeks prior to the date of the 17election. The clerk shall give at least two weeks notice of the 18time and place of the election by publication for 2 successive 19weeks in the manner provided by Section 4-22. Notice by 20mailing shall not be required.21    Voting shall be by secret ballot. The clerk of the circuit 22court shall cause the ballots to be prepared in the manner set 23forth in this paragraph. To enable the number of votes cast to 24be calculated in conformance with the requirements in the 25following paragraph, there shall be a ballot for each parcel 26of land listed on the district's then-current assessment roll.   SB3017- 3 -LRB104 17953 TRT 31390 b1The face of each ballot shall identify the parcel, the number 2of acres or part of an acre within said parcel, and the name or 3names of the owner or owners of the parcel. Each ballot The 4ballots shall also show on its their face the name of the 5district, the date of the election, the term for which a 6commissioner is to be elected, the names of the declared 7candidates and a blank line for write-in candidates. A square 8shall appear before each name and before the blank line. The 9reverse side of the ballot shall show the official nature of 10the ballot by the certificate of the clerk.11    Adult owners Every adult owner of land in the district 12shall be entitled to vote in the manner provided for in this 13paragraph. An adult owner is entitled to one vote per acre or 14part of an acre within each parcel of land owned by the owner 15and located in the district. If a parcel of land is owned by 16more than one adult owner, only one of the owners representing 17all of the owners may cast a ballot for that parcel. The votes 18represented by the ballot shall equal the number of acres or 19part of an acre shown on the face of the ballot. By casting a 20ballot, the voter certifies that he or she is the owner of the 21land or, when the land is owned by multiple owners, the voter 22casting the ballot certifies that a majority of the owners 23have granted him or her the authority to cast the ballot on 24behalf of all the owners. Any qualified person owning land 25with the district may declare his or her candidacy for the 26office of commissioner and thereby become entitled to have his   SB3017- 4 -LRB104 17953 TRT 31390 b1or her name placed on the ballot by filing a statement of his 2or her candidacy in writing with the clerk at least 3 weeks 3prior to the date of the election.4    The commissioners in office at the time of the election 5shall be the judges of the election. If In the event that one 6or more of the commissioners is absent or refuses to serve as 7judge, then the electors present at the opening of the polls 8may choose a person or persons to fill the vacancy or 9vacancies. The polls shall open at 4:00 p.m. 2:00 P.M. and 10close at 6:00 p.m. 4:00 P.M. unless the judges of election 11shall determine to hold the polls open a longer period to 12accommodate the voters. In no event shall the polls remain 13open later than 7:00 p.m. 6:00 P.M.14    The judges of the election shall not be responsible for 15determining the ownership of any parcel of land and may rely 16upon the representations of the person presenting himself or 17herself as the owner of the parcel or the person authorized by 18a majority of the other owners of the parcel to cast the ballot 19on behalf of all the owners. If a parcel of land is owned by a 20public or private corporation or other entity or entities, the 21person presenting himself or herself on behalf of the owner or 22owners certifies that he or she has the authority to cast the 23ballot on behalf of the owner or owners. The judges of election 24may take reasonable measures to verify that no more than one 25person casts a ballot for each parcel of land. Whoever 26willfully misrepresents his or her eligibility to cast a   SB3017- 5 -LRB104 17953 TRT 31390 b1ballot in an election shall be deemed guilty of a Class A 2Misdemeanor. 3    Upon the closing of the polls the judges of election shall 4promptly canvass the ballots and the ballots together with the 5poll books, tally lists and the results shall be returned to 6the clerk of the circuit court within 48 hours after the 7election. The candidate receiving the largest number of votes 8shall be declared elected upon the certification of the votes 9by the election judges. In case of a tie the judges shall 10determine by lot who is elected. The expense of the election 11shall be borne by the district.12    In the event that a vacancy occurs in the office of 13commissioner whether by death, ineligibility, removal from 14office or failure to qualify the commissioners in office shall 15fill the vacancy by appointment. The commissioner so appointed 16shall serve until the next annual election. If the unexpired 17term caused by such vacancy be for more than one year then, at 18the next annual election, the adult landowners shall elect a 19commissioner to complete the then unexpired portion of the 20term in addition to electing a commissioner for a regular 21term.22    Commissioners elected under this Section shall, within 20 23days after their election, qualify by subscribing to an oath 24of office and giving bond, in the manner provided in Section 254-4.26(Source: P.A. 86-297.)